apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="dèp/ere__vbmod" c="p.40">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>o</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>es</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>et</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emus</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>edes</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ent</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ia</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ias</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iat</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iamus</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iais</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>iant</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>amus</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ais</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ere</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eres</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eret</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eremus</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ereis</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>erent</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>idu</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ida</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idos</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>idas</l><r>ere<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="bisogni/are__vblex" c="">
      <e>       <p><l>are</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>are</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>endi</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ende</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>at</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ant</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>aiat</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aiant</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>et</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ent</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>aret</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>arent</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>adu</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ada</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ados</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>adas</l><r>are<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bisogniare"><i>bisogni</i><par n="bisogni/are__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bisogniare" r="LR"><p><l>bisonz</l><r>bisogni</r></p><par n="bisogni/are__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dèpere"><i>dèp</i><par n="dèp/ere__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="dèpere" r="LR"><p><l>dep</l><r>dèp</r></p><par n="dèp/ere__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="dèpere" r="LR"><p><l>dev</l><r>dèp</r></p><par n="dèp/ere__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="dèpere" r="LR"><p><l>dèv</l><r>dèp</r></p><par n="dèp/ere__vbmod"/></e>
